Idaho statutes. Title 23 ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGES
Chapter 13 COUNTY OPTION KITCHEN AND TABLE WINE ACT
§ 23-1322. Monthly reports of sales — Payment of excise tax with report.

Each person liable for the payment of taxes on wine as provided for in section 23-1319, Idaho Code, shall, on or before the fifteenth day of each month, or for such other period as the state tax commission may prescribe by rule, file a written report with the state tax commission showing all sales of wine for resale or consumption in this state made by such person during the calendar month or other period immediately preceding. Taxes payable with respect to such sale shall be paid by the person liable therefor at the time such report is filed.

History.

1971, ch. 156, § 22, p. 760; am. 2009, ch. 4, § 2, p. 6.

§ 23-1322A. Collection and enforcement.

The collection and enforcement procedures provided by the Idaho income tax act, sections 63-3042 through 63-3065A, inclusive, and sections 63-3068 and 63-3075, Idaho Code, shall apply and be available to the state tax commission for enforcement and collection of the tax imposed by this chapter, and said sections shall, for this purpose, be considered part of this act. Any reference to taxable year in the income tax act shall, for the purposes of this act, be considered a taxable period.

History.

I.C.,§ 23-1322A, as added by 1980, ch. 239, § 6, p. 554; am. 1984, ch. 105, § 4, p. 244; am. 2007, ch. 10, § 10, p. 10.

§ 23-1323. Rules and regulations concerning excise tax — Power of tax commission.

The state tax commission shall be, and it is hereby authorized to adopt and promulgate such rules and regulations as it may be necessary to assure payment of taxes on wine, including but not limited to, rules and regulations prescribing the form and content of monthly reports required; requiring the persons liable for payment of taxes on wine to show on such monthly reports information concerning their inventories, purchases, sales and shipments of wine, requiring monthly informational reports from distributors concerning their inventories, purchases, sales and shipments of wine; requiring reports from carriers, both public and private, concerning deliveries of wine made in this state by such carriers, and shipments of wine made by such carriers out of this state; requiring distributors and persons liable for payment of taxes on wine to maintain complete and accurate books, records and accounts on transactions involving wine; and establishing grounds upon which delay in filing reports and paying taxes imposed upon wine may be considered justifiable and without fault on the part of the person liable therefor.

History.

1971, ch. 156, § 23, p. 760.

§ 23-1324. License and transfer fees — Alcohol beverage control fund.

All moneys from license and transfer fees that are collected by the director pursuant to the provisions of this chapter shall be paid over to the state treasurer for deposit in the alcohol beverage control fund created in section 23-940, Idaho Code. All other moneys collected by the director pursuant to the provisions of this chapter shall be paid over to the state treasurer for deposit in the general fund.

History.

I.C.,§ 23-1324, as added by 2012, ch. 160, § 3, p. 435.

§ 23-1325. Financial interest in or aid to retailers prohibited — Certain aid permitted.

It shall be unlawful for any importer, distributor, vintner or winery, directly or indirectly, or through an affiliate, subsidiary, officer, director, agent or employee:

To have any financial interest in any licensed retailer’s business, or to own or control any real property upon which a licensed retailer conducts his business, except that this subsection (1)(a) shall not apply to any winery, as defined in section 23-1303, Idaho Code, or to property that has been owned or controlled continuously for more than one (1) year prior to July 1, 1975; or

To aid or assist any licensed retailer by giving such retailer, or any employee thereof, any discounts, premiums or rebates in connection with any sale of wine; or

To aid or assist any retailer by furnishing, giving, renting, lending or selling any equipment, signs, supplies, wine menus or wine lists, services, or other thing of value which may be used in conducting the retailer’s retail wine business, except as expressly permitted by this chapter; or

To enter into any lease or other agreement with any retail licensee to control the product or products sold by such retailer; or

To provide for any rental or other charge to be paid to or by the retailer for product display or advertising display space.

An importer, distributor, vintner or winery as an incident to merchandising in the ordinary course of business, and if available to all licensed retailers without discrimination, may sell to a retailer equipment, supplies or clothing which may be used in conducting the retailer’s retail wine business. A winery, vintner, importer or distributor may not sell such equipment or supplies at a price, or under terms, intended or designed to encourage or induce the retailer to use products of the seller to the exclusion of the products of other wineries, vintners, importers or distributors. In no event shall the sales price of such equipment or supplies be less than the reasonable value of such equipment or supplies.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (2) of this section, a vintner, winery, importer or distributor, as an incident to merchandising in the ordinary course of business, and if available to all retailers without discrimination, may lend, give, furnish or sell to a retailer, the following items:

Those services, equipment, brochures and recipes authorized under the provisions of sections 23-1325A and 23-1325B, Idaho Code;

Signs, posters, placards, designs, devices, decorations or graphic displays bearing advertising matter and for use in windows or elsewhere in the interior of a retail establishment. The importer, distributor, vintner or winery shall not directly or indirectly pay or credit the retailer for displaying such materials or for any expense incidental to their operation;

Newspaper cuts, mats or engraved blocks for use in retailer’s advertisements;

Items such as sport schedules, posters, calendars, informational pamphlets, decals and other similar materials for display at the point of sale which bear brand advertising for wine prominently displayed thereon, and which items are intended for use by the retailer’s customers off the licensed premises and which items are made available to the retailer’s customers for such purpose;
(e) Temporary signs or banners displaying a vintner’s, winery’s or distributor’s name, trademark or label, which signs may be permitted to be temporarily displayed on the exterior portion of the retailer premises in connection with a special event, in accordance with such rules relating thereto as may be established by the director.

A distributor may perform services incident to or in connection with the stocking, rotation and restocking of wine sold and delivered to such licensed retailer on or in such licensed retailer’s storeroom, salesroom shelves or refrigerating units, including the marking or remarking of containers of such wine to indicate the selling price as established by the retailer and to the arranging, rearranging, or relocating of advertising displays referred to in this section. A distributor may, with the permission of the retailer and in accordance with space allocations directed by the retailer, set, remove, replace, reset or relocate all wine upon shelves of the retailer. Labor performed or schematics prepared by the distributor relating to conduct authorized pursuant to the provisions of this subsection (4) shall not constitute prohibited conduct.

An importer, distributor, vintner or winery may furnish or give to a retailer authorized to sell wine for consumption on the licensed premises, for sampling purposes only, a container of wine, containing not more than sixty-four (64) ounces, not currently being sold by the retailer, and which container is clearly marked “NOT FOR SALE—FOR SAMPLING PURPOSES ONLY.”

A licensed winery may aid or assist a licensed retail wine outlet which retails exclusively the wine product of that winery and which outlet is wholly owned and operated by that winery. Two (2) or more wineries may use the same location for their respective retail wine outlets provided each outlet holds a separate retail wine license or wine by the drink license.

Every violation of the provisions of this section by an importer, distributor, vintner or winery in which a licensed retailer shall have actively participated shall constitute a violation on the part of such licensed retailer.

History.

I.C.,§ 23-1325, as added by 1975, ch. 151, § 5, p. 383; am. 1976, ch. 34, § 2, p. 71; am. 1984, ch. 221, § 10, p. 530; am. 1991, ch. 159, § 2, p. 380; am. 1994, ch. 361, § 2, p. 1131; am. 2007, ch. 289, § 2, p. 821; am. 2008, ch. 180, § 1, p. 544.

§ 23-1325A. Services permitted incident to stocking, rotation and restocking of wine.

For the purposes of section 23-1325(4), Idaho Code, a distributor may, with the permission of the retailer, and in accordance with space allocations directed by the retailer, set, remove, replace, reset or relocate all wine upon the shelves of the retailer. Labor performed or schematics prepared by the distributor relating to conduct authorized pursuant to the provisions of this section shall not constitute prohibited conduct or unlawful aid to a retailer.

History.

I.C.,§ 23-1325A, as added by 1984, ch. 232, § 2, p. 560; am. 2020, ch. 82, § 14, p. 174.

§ 23-1325B. Services permitted incident to wine dispensing systems — Certain advertising materials permitted.

To the extent permitted by federal law and regulations adopted pursuant thereto, a distributor may furnish, install and perform repair services on wine dispensing systems on the premises of a retailer. The distributor shall collect from the retailer the reasonable value thereof, which value shall not be less than the cost of such system or service to the distributor. Dispensing systems may include, but shall not be limited to, tapping devices, spigots, valves, hose, washers, couplings, clamps, air hose, vents, faucets and pumping devices and CO2 regulators. A distributor may perform cleaning and sanitary services relating to the dispensing system without charge.

Notwithstanding the provisions of section 23-1325, Idaho Code, a distributor may furnish to the retailer, without charge, recipes and brochures explaining wine and other products.

Labor performed or equipment, brochures or recipes furnished pursuant to the provisions of this section shall not constitute prohibited conduct or unlawful aid to a retailer.

History.

I.C.,§ 23-1325B, as added by 1990, ch. 406, § 1, p. 1132.

§ 23-1325C. Wine sample tasting requirements and limitations for events on retail wine license premises.

Vintners, wineries and distributors may conduct or assist a retail wine licensee at a wine sample tasting on premises not licensed for the sale of wine by the individual glass or opened bottle for consumption on the premises or on the premises of the holder of a wine by the drink license for the purpose of promoting their wine products to the public. The holder of a retail wine license or a wine by the drink license may also conduct wine sample tasting events, with or without the assistance of a vintner, winery or distributor in accordance with this section.

A retail wine licensee shall not be required to hold a wine by the drink license for the purpose of conducting or permitting wine sample tasting events on the premises in accordance with this section unless a charge or other consideration is required of the customer by the retailer in exchange for such wine sample.

Sample tasting events permitted pursuant to this section shall be conducted subject to all of the following requirements:

Sample sizes. The size of each sample of wine shall not exceed one and one-half (1 ½) ounces.

Identified tasting area. The retail wine licensee who conducts tastings or who allows a vintner, winery or distributor to conduct tastings on the retail wine premises shall identify a specific tasting area or areas. Such area or areas shall be of a size and design such that the retail wine licensee and the persons conducting the tasting can observe and control persons in the area to ensure that no minors or visibly intoxicated persons possess or consume alcohol. Customers must remain in the tasting area or areas until they have finished consuming the sample. The retailer shall keep on file at the premises a floor plan identifying the tasting area or areas. If a retailer does not have an identified tasting area or areas, the director may require prior approval of an area or areas before the retailer conducts any more tastings or allows any more tastings to be conducted by the vintner, winery or distributor on the premises.

Number of in-store tastings. Although there is no limit on the number of tastings a retailer may conduct without the assistance of a vintner, winery or distributor, the retailer shall not permit a vintner, winery or distributor to conduct, or assist in conducting, tastings on the premises of the same licensee more than eight (8) times per calendar year.

Vintner, winery or distributor conducted tastings. A vintner, winery or distributor may hold tastings on consecutive days on one (1) retail premises, provided the tastings shall not exceed two (2) consecutive days. Tastings shall be conducted at least four (4) weeks apart. If a vintner, winery or distributor holds tastings on two (2) consecutive days, they shall not hold another tasting on those retail premises for at least four (4) weeks.

Server requirements. Persons serving or pouring wine at wine tastings on premises for which a wine by the drink license has not been issued must be at least twenty-one (21) years of age.

Vintner, winery or distributor conducted sample tastings. A vintner, winery or distributor may conduct wine sample tastings on premises licensed for the sale of wine for products produced or sold by the vintner, winery or distributor. The vintner, winery or distributor conducting the wine sample tasting shall, in addition to compliance with other requirements of this section, comply with all of the following requirements:
(a) Provide the product to be tasted, and remove any remaining product at the end of the tasting.

Retailer conducted wine sample tastings. Retail wine licensees and wine by the drink licensees may conduct wine sample tastings on their licensed premises and may:

Accept assistance from a vintner, winery or distributor if:

The only assistance provided is an employee to provide information or education relating to the product being sampled;

The retailer pays for the wine; and

The retailer is responsible for any advertising.

Conduct an unlimited number of wine sample tastings on the premises if there is no vintner, winery or distributor providing assistance for the event. The retailer may advertise such events.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, participation by a vintner, winery or distributor in a wine sample tasting event, if expressly authorized by this section, shall not constitute prohibited conduct or unlawful aid to a retailer.

(b) Provide or pay for a person to serve the wine. The server must be an employee or agent of the vintner, winery or distributor and shall not be an employee or agent of a retailer. The vintner, winery or distributor shall not compensate any employee or agent of the retail licensee to participate in the tasting.

(c) The vintner, winery or distributor shall keep a record of each tasting it conducts, including the date and location of each event and the products served.

History.

I.C.,§ 23-1325C, as added by 2004, ch. 267, § 1, p. 749.

§ 23-1326. Credit sales to retailers prohibited.

No sale or delivery of wine shall be made to any retailer, except for cash paid at the time of or prior to delivery thereof, or except as provided by electronic funds transfer in accordance with subsection (3) of this section, and in no event shall any distributor extend any credit on account of such wine to a retailer, nor shall any retailer accept or receive delivery of such wine except when payment therefor is made in cash at the time of or prior to delivery thereof, or by electronic funds transfer in accordance with subsection (3) of this section.

The acceptance of a first party check from a retailer by a distributor, or the use of a debit card by a licensed retailer, shall not be deemed an extension of or acceptance of credit pursuant to this section.

The acceptance and use of an electronic funds transfer shall not be deemed an extension or acceptance of credit pursuant to this section, provided such transfer is initiated and completed promptly and in no event completed later than five (5) business days following delivery of such wine. Any attempt by a licensed retailer to delay payment of an electronic funds transfer pursuant to this section for any period of time beyond the time set forth in this subsection, shall be deemed an acceptance of credit by the licensed retailer.

Any extension or acceptance of credit in violation of the provisions of this section shall constitute the giving and receiving of aid or assistance to or by a licensed retailer prohibited by the provisions of section 23-1325, Idaho Code.

History.

1971, ch. 156, § 26, p. 760; am. 1999, ch. 206, § 3, p. 553; am. 2011, ch. 255, § 2, p. 699; am. 2013, ch. 288, § 2, p. 760.

§ 23-1327. Sale of wine in original container and size of containers.

No distributor shall purchase, receive, or sell any wine except in the original container as prepared for the market by the importer or manufacturer. No importer or distributor shall, without permission of the director, adopt or use any container for wine that will contain in excess of fifteen (15) gallons of wine.

History.

1971, ch. 156, § 27, p. 760; am. 1974, ch. 27, § 71, p. 811; am. 2005, ch. 32, § 1, p. 147; am. 2013, ch. 142, § 1, p. 339.

§ 23-1328. Retailer’s name on labels prohibited — Discrimination among retailers prohibited.

No label on a wine container shall be used or placed thereon which indicates that a retailer is the producer or the bottler thereof or which contains the name of a retailer in any manner, except in the case of wineries licensed under this chapter, in which case such winery may sell a product processed and bottled by or for that winery upon satisfaction of all terms and conditions of this chapter relating to licensure for retail sale of wine. No distributor shall restrict the sale of wine for which the distributor has filed a price schedule in accordance with the provisions of this act to one retailer or to retail premises under common ownership or associated together in, by, or through a buying organization or agency which represents a common identity to the public; nor shall such distributor refuse to sell or distribute wine to a retailer on terms and conditions different from those terms and conditions upon which said distributor sells or distributes wine to other retailers.

History.

1971, ch. 156, § 28, p. 760; am. 1984, ch. 221, § 11, p. 530; am. 1987, ch. 169, § 6, p. 330; am. 1993, ch. 333, § 3, p. 1232.

§ 23-1328A. Prohibition of certain trade practices between vintners, wineries, importers or dealers and distributors.

It shall be unlawful for any vintners, winery, importer or dealer, directly or indirectly, or through an affiliate, subsidiary, officer, director, agent or employee:

To require, by agreement or otherwise, that any distributors engaged in the sale or distribution of wine in the state of Idaho purchase any such wine or other distributed products from such person to the exclusion in whole or in part of wine or other products made or imported by other vintners, wineries, importers or dealers;

To induce, by any means, any distributor engaged in the sale or distribution of wine to purchase from or distribute the wine or other products of any vintner, winery, importer or dealer to the exclusion of the wine or products of other vintners, wineries, importers or dealers by any means, including, but not limited to the vintner’s, winery’s, importer’s or dealer’s acquisition of any interest in the distributor’s license, or by acquiring any interest in the real or personal property owned, occupied, or used by the distributor;

To discriminate in price, allowance, rebate, refund, commission, discount, or service between a distributor purchasing wine or a distributor purchasing other products;

To threaten any distributor with any discrimination prohibited under subsection (1)(c) of this section, with the purpose or effect of changing or maintaining resale prices of the vintner, winery, importer or dealer;

To impose conditions or restrictions on a distributor not generally imposed on other distributors; or

To cause a termination, cancellation, nonrenewal or substantial change in competitive circumstances in the relationship with the distributor without providing at least ninety (90) days’ written notice of the termination, cancellation, nonrenewal or substantial change in competitive circumstances. The notice shall state all the reasons for termination, cancellation, nonrenewal or substantial change in competitive circumstances and shall provide that the distributor has ninety (90) days from the date of receipt by said distributor of the vintner’s, winery’s, importer’s or dealer’s notice in which to rectify any claimed deficiency. If the deficiency is rectified within ninety (90) days the notice shall be void. The notice provisions of this section shall not apply if the reason for termination, cancellation or nonrenewal is insolvency, the occurrence of an assignment for the benefit of creditors, or bankruptcy. If the reason for termination, cancellation, nonrenewal or substantial change in competitive circumstances is nonpayment of sums due for the purchase of product, the distributor shall be entitled to written notice of such default, and shall have twenty (20) days in which to remedy such default from the date of delivery or posting of such notice.

Nothing in this section shall be deemed to prohibit vintners, wineries, importers or dealers from selecting their own customers in bona fide transactions not in restraint of trade.

History.

I.C.,§ 23-1328A, as added by 1979, ch. 301, § 1, p. 820; am. 1984, ch. 221, § 12, p. 530.

§ 23-1329. Schedules of prices — Filing by importers and distributors — Modification or withdrawal.

Each importer and distributor shall file with the director a written schedule of prices to be charged by such person for wine imported into or sold within this state for resale therein. Such schedule of prices shall be uniform for buyers in the same trade area within this state, and shall set forth the following:

All brands and types of products offered for sale;

The delivered sale price thereof in the several trade areas of the state; and

Any allowance granted for returned containers.

an increase in prices, for a minimum period of thirty (30) days;

a reduction in prices for a minimum period of six (6) months.

Such schedule of prices so filed may be changed or modified from time to time by filing with the director a new schedule of prices, not less than ten (10) days prior to the last day of the filing calendar month, becoming effective on the first day of the succeeding calendar month. Upon the filing of said new prices, the director shall give notice thereof to all importers and distributors. Such schedule of prices so filed may not be withdrawn prior to its effective date, and upon becoming effective shall remain in effect as follows:

Upon the filing of the original schedule of prices, and after the effective date of any schedule of prices amendatory thereto, all prices therein stated shall be strictly adhered to. Amendatory schedules shall recite the information required in the above subsections (a), (b) and (c).

History.

1971, ch. 156, § 29, p. 760; am. 1974, ch. 27, § 72, p. 811; am. 1975, ch. 151, § 6, p. 383.

§ 23-1330. Rules and regulations by director.

For the purpose of the administration of this act, the director shall make, promulgate, and publish such rules and regulations as the director may deem necessary for carrying out the provisions of this act and for the orderly and efficient administration hereof, and except as may be limited or prohibited by law and the provisions of this act, such rules and regulations so made and promulgated shall have the force of statute. All rules and regulations adopted pursuant to the terms of this act shall be adopted in accordance with the [and] subject to the provisions of chapter 52, title 67, Idaho Code.

History.

1971, ch. 156, § 30, p. 760; am. 1974, ch. 27, § 73, p. 811.

§ 23-1331. Suspension, revocation, and refusal to renew licenses and permits — Monetary penalty.

The director may suspend, revoke, or refuse to renew a retail wine license, wine by the drink license, wine distributor’s license, wine importer’s license, winery license, bonded wine warehouse license, wine direct shipper’s permit or vintner’s license issued pursuant to the terms of this chapter for any violation of or failure to comply with the provisions of this chapter or rules and regulations promulgated by the director or the state tax commission pursuant to the terms and conditions of this chapter. Manufacturing or bottling functions of a winery shall not be subject to suspension, revocation or nonrenewal of a license, except for violations of law directly related to the manufacturing or bottling activities of the winery. Procedures for the suspension, revocation or refusal to grant or renew licenses issued under this chapter shall be in accordance with the provisions of chapter 52, title 67, Idaho Code.

When the director determines to suspend such license, the affected licensee may petition the director prior to the effective date of the suspension requesting that a monetary payment be allowed in lieu of the license suspension. If the director determines such payment to be consistent with the purpose of the laws of the state of Idaho and is in the public interest, he shall establish a monetary payment in an amount not to exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000). The licensee may reject the payment amount determined by the director, and instead be subject to the suspension provisions of subsection (1) of this section. Upon payment of the amount established, the director shall cancel the suspension period. The director shall cause any payment to be paid to the treasurer of the state of Idaho for credit to the state’s general account in the state operating fund.

The suspension of a license for the sale of liquor or beer shall automatically result in the suspension of any license for the sale of wine held by the same licensee and issued for the same premises or location. Such additional suspension shall be equal in length to and run concurrently with the period of the original suspension.

When a proceeding to revoke or suspend a license has been or is about to be instituted during the time a renewal application of such license is pending before the director, the director shall renew the license notwithstanding the pending proceedings, but such renewed license may be revoked or suspended without hearing if and when the previous license is, for any reason, revoked or suspended.

History.

1971, ch. 156, § 31, p. 760; am. 1973, ch. 144, § 8, p. 281; am. 1974, ch. 27, § 74, p. 811; am. 1979, ch. 145, § 3, p. 445; am. 1980, ch. 221, § 1, p. 493; am. 1981, ch. 199, § 3, p. 351; am. 1984, ch. 221, § 13, p. 530; am. 1991, ch. 50, § 3, p. 91; am. 1993, ch. 347, § 3, p. 1290; am. 2014, ch. 122, § 1, p. 352; am. 2017, ch. 31, § 1, p. 52; am. 2020, ch. 10, § 8, p. 12.

§ 23-1332. Sale by by-the-drink liquor licensees.

Retailers holding valid licenses for the retail sale of liquor by the drink pursuant to chapter 9, title 23, Idaho Code, may sell wine for consumption on or off the licensed premises. Persons holding a valid wine by the drink license may sell wine for consumption on the premises only. Retailers who do not possess a valid license for the retail sale of liquor by the drink, or retailers who do not have a valid wine by the drink license, shall not permit consumption of wine on the licensed premises and may sell the wine only in its original unbroken container. Provided however, that wineries whose business does not include the sale of wine by the drink may provide free single-serving samples of two (2) ounces or less to customers for the purpose of sales promotion upon the winery premises or upon the premises of a retail wine outlet which retails exclusively the wine product of that winery and which is wholly owned and operated thereby. Wine sold for consumption or dispensed on the licensed premises may be sold, consumed or dispensed only during hours that beer can be sold, consumed or dispensed pursuant to the laws of this state. Wine sold by the retailer for consumption off the premises of the retailer may be sold only during the hours that beer may be sold pursuant to the laws of this state.

History.

1971, ch. 156, § 32, p. 760; am. 1973, ch. 144, § 9, p. 281; am. 1983, ch. 165, § 1, p. 471; am. 1987, ch. 169, § 7, p. 330.

§ 23-1333. Open or unsealed containers of wine in motor vehicles on highways prohibited.

No person may, while operating or riding in or upon a motor vehicle upon a public highway of this state, have in his possession any wine in an open or unsealed container of any kind.

History.

1971, ch. 156, § 33, p. 760.

§ 23-1334. Minors — Authorization to deliver.

The prohibitions on possession of wine by any person under the age of twenty-one (21) years do not apply to possession by a person under the age of twenty-one (21) years making a delivery in pursuance of the order of his parent or in pursuance of his employment, or when such person under the age of twenty-one (21) years is in a private residence accompanied by his parent or guardian and with such parent’s or guardian’s consent.

Any person who shall, by any means, represent to any retailer or distributor or the agent or employee of such retailer or distributor, that any other person is twenty-one (21) years or more of age, when in fact such other person is under the age of twenty-one (21) years, for the purpose of entering licensed premises or inducing such retailer or distributor, or the agent or employee of such retailer or distributor, to sell, serve, or dispense wine to such other person shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

History.

1971, ch. 156, § 34, p. 760; am. 1972, ch. 331, § 1, p. 833; am. 1976, ch. 292, § 1, p. 1010; am. 1987, ch. 212, § 14, p. 448; am. 1991, ch. 269, § 4, p. 660; am. 1994, ch. 60, § 1, p. 119; am. 1999, ch. 59, § 11, p. 151.

§ 23-1335. Violations of act misdemeanors.

Any person who violates any of the provisions of this act or fails to comply with any of the terms and conditions of this act shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

History.

1971, ch. 156, § 35, p. 760.

§ 23-1336. Wine sold or donated to persons or associations for benevolent, charitable or public purposes.

In the event that wine has been sold or donated to a person or association which desires to dispense or sell such wine and to donate the proceeds from the sale or dispensing thereof for benevolent, charitable or public purposes, the director may issue a permit authorizing such sale or dispensing of wine by such person or association if the director is satisfied that said proceeds, after deducting reasonable expenses incurred in conjunction with the sale or dispensing thereof, will be donated for such benevolent, charitable or public purpose. The director shall prescribe the form of the application for such permit, which application may require disclosure of names of sponsors; donors, quantities and types of wine products donated; the retailer, if any, designated by such person or association to receive, store or dispense donated wine; the dates and hours during which the permit is to be effective, not to exceed three (3) consecutive days; and such other information as the director may require. The director shall collect a twenty dollar ($20.00) fee for the event for which the permit is to be effective. The director may require that the applicant submit a report to the director after the benevolent, charitable or public purpose event showing the disposition of funds from the event. Should the director determine that the applicant or its representatives is violating, or has in the past violated, any law pertaining to the dispensing or sale of wine by a licensed retailer relating to hours of sale, or relating to dispensing wine to underaged persons, or has failed in the past to submit such information as may have been requested by the director, such permit may be summarily suspended by the director, prior to hearing, or may be denied pending a hearing. A licensed retailer may, on behalf of the permittee, receive or store wine to be used at the event, and may dispense such wine to attendees of the benevolent, charitable or public purpose event for which the permit has been issued.

History.

I.C.,§ 23-1336, as added by 1991, ch. 162, § 2, p. 389; am. 1994, ch. 14, § 2, p. 20.

§ 23-1337. Alcohol beverage catering permit.

Any person who is the holder of an Idaho winery license shall be eligible to obtain an alcohol beverage catering permit. Two (2) or more wineries may use a winery’s licensed premises to host an event under an alcohol beverage catering permit to serve and sell their respective wines at that event.

History.

I.C.,§ 23-1337, as added by 1992, ch. 235, § 1, p. 703; am. 1999, ch. 58, § 6, p. 146; am. 2016, ch. 181, § 1, p. 491.

§ 23-1338. Wine product service and sales — Sponsored events.

Any person who is the holder of an Idaho winery license is authorized to serve or sell any wine product of that winery at events of seven (7) days’ duration or less sponsored by any group, organization, person or political subdivision. Each participating winery must make its own arrangements with the sponsoring group, organization, person or political subdivision. Service and sales under the authority of this section may occur only in counties that permit the sale of wine in accordance with section 23-1304, Idaho Code, and any service or sales under the provisions of this section must comply with all applicable limitations and requirements regarding day and hour of sale, age and condition of purchasers and all other requirements of any regulatory ordinance adopted pursuant to the authority of section 23-1318, Idaho Code, by the city or county in whose jurisdiction the event is to take place.

At least seven (7) days prior to the date on which the sponsored event is to commence, the winery shall notify by electronic mail the Idaho state police, alcohol beverage control bureau, and the chief of police of the incorporated city in which the sponsored event will be held, if the event is to be held in an incorporated city, or the sheriff of the county in which the sponsored event is to be held, if the event will not be held in an incorporated city, that wine will be served or sold by the winery at the sponsored event. The notice shall provide the following information:

The name and address of the winery and the number of its state winery license;

The dates and hours that wine will be served or sold;

The name of the group, organization, person or political subdivision sponsoring the event; and

The address at which the wine will be served or sold, and if a public building, the rooms in which the wine will be served or sold.

Within three (3) business days after receiving the notice, the alcohol beverage control bureau shall respond to the winery. An approval by the alcohol beverage control bureau shall serve as authorization for the event, and shall be displayed during all hours that wine is served or sold at the sponsored event.

Neither the winery nor any person owning an interest in the winery, nor any employee, contractor or business associate of the winery shall qualify as an event sponsor under the provisions of this section.

Neither a city nor a county license or permit is required for the activities authorized pursuant to the provisions of this section.

History.

I.C.,§ 23-1338, as added by 2007, ch. 289, § 3, p. 821.